Utah statutes.
48-2c-401.   Organizer.

(1) (a)  One or more persons may act as organizers of a company by signing and filing with the division articles of organization that meet the requirements of Section 48-2c-403.

(b)  An organizer who is a natural person must be 18 years of age or older.

(c)  The persons acting as organizers may be members or managers of the company at the time of formation or after formation has occurred.

(2) (a)  The signing of the articles of organization constitutes an affirmation by the organizers that:

(i)  the company has one or more members; and

(ii)  if the company is manager-managed, the person or persons named as managers in the articles of organization have consented to serve as managers of the company.

(b)  At or prior to filing articles of organization for a company, the organizer or organizers shall prepare a writing to be held with the records of the company that sets forth for each company that is not to be member-managed, the name and street address of each initial member of the company.

